Utah statutes.
63A-5-501.   Making keys to buildings of state, political subdivisions or colleges and universities without permission prohibited.

No person shall knowingly make or cause to be made any key or duplicate key for any building, laboratory, facility, room, dormitory, hall or any other structure or part thereof owned by the state, by any political subdivision thereof or by the board of regents or other governing body of any college or university which is supported wholly or in part by the state without the prior written consent of the state, political subdivision, board of regents, or other governing body.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

